Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.301, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Expiration. A reintegration driver's license expires deleted text begin 15deleted text end new text begin 24new text end months from the date of issuance of the license. A reintegration driver's license may not be renewed. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to reintegration licenses issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.301, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Issuance of regular driver's license. (a) Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, the commissioner must issue a REAL ID-compliant or noncompliant license to a person who possesses a reintegration driver's license if: (1) the person has possessed the reintegration driver's license for at least one full year; (2) the reintegration driver's license has not been canceled under subdivision 4 and has not new text begin been new text end expired new text begin for more than 90 days from the date new text end under subdivision 5; (3) the person meets the application requirements under section 171.06, including payment of the applicable fees, surcharge, and filing fee under sections 171.06, subdivisions 2 and 2a, and 171.061, subdivision 4; and (4) issuance of the license does not conflict with the requirements of the nonresident violator compact. (b) The commissioner must forgive any outstanding balance due on a reinstatement fee or surcharge under sections 171.20, subdivision 4, and 171.29, subdivision 2, for a person who is eligible and applies for a license under paragraph (a). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end